Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-403
Cemetery board; officers; employees.

The members of the cemetery board may select such officers from among their own number as they may deem necessary, and shall have the power to employ such labor and assistants as they may deem necessary from persons not belonging to said board.

Laws 1917, c. 207, § 3, p. 497;

C.S.1922, § 4494;

C.S.1929, § 13-403;

R.S.1943, § 12-403.